Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1915
Discovery order; specify time, place, and manner of inspections and making copies.

An order issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 29-1912 to 29-1921 shall specify the time, place, and manner of making the inspections and of making copies or photographs and may prescribe such terms and conditions as are just.

Laws 1969, c. 235, § 4, p. 869.

A protective order limiting the defendant's and defense counsel's access to sensitive items in a sexual assault on a child case was properly granted. State v. Lovette, 15 Neb. App. 590, 733 N.W.2d 567 (2007).